src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.aff
SFX A or abarisve or 
SFX A or abatur or 
SFX A or abaturque or 
SFX A or abaturne or 
SFX A or abaturve or 
SFX A or abamur or 
SFX A or abamurque or 
SFX A or abamurne or 
SFX A or abamurve or 
SFX A or abamini or 
SFX A or abaminique or 
SFX A or abaminine or 
SFX A or abaminive or 
SFX A or abantur or 
SFX A or abanturque or 
SFX A or abanturne or 
SFX A or abanturve or 
SFX A or abor or # infectum personnel indicatif futur
SFX A or aborque or 
SFX A or aborne or 
SFX A or aborve or 
SFX A or aberis or 
SFX A or aberisque or 
SFX A or aberisne or 
SFX A or aberisve or 
SFX A or abitur or 
SFX A or abiturque or 
SFX A or abiturne or 
SFX A or abiturve or 
SFX A or abimur or 
SFX A or abimurque or 
SFX A or abimurne or 
SFX A or abimurve or 
SFX A or abimini or 
SFX A or abiminique or 
SFX A or abiminine or 
SFX A or abiminive or 
SFX A or abuntur or 
SFX A or abunturque or 
SFX A or abunturne or 
SFX A or abunturve or 
SFX A or er or # infectum personnel subjonctif présent
SFX A or erque or 
SFX A or erne or 
SFX A or erve or 
SFX A or eris or 
SFX A or erisque or 
SFX A or erisne or 
SFX A or erisve or 
SFX A or etur or 
SFX A or eturque or 
SFX A or eturne or 
SFX A or eturve or 
SFX A or emur or 
SFX A or emurque or 
SFX A or emurne or 
SFX A or emurve or 
SFX A or emini or 
SFX A or eminique or 
SFX A or eminine or 
SFX A or eminive or 
SFX A or entur or 
SFX A or enturque or 
SFX A or enturne or 
SFX A or enturve or 
SFX A or arer or # infectum personnel subjonctif imparfait
SFX A or arerque or 
SFX A or arerne or 
SFX A or arerve or 
SFX A or areris or 
SFX A or arerisque or 
SFX A or arerisne or 
SFX A or arerisve or 
SFX A or aretur or 
SFX A or areturque or 
SFX A or areturne or 
SFX A or areturve or 
SFX A or aremur or 
SFX A or aremurque or 
SFX A or aremurne or 
SFX A or aremurve or 
SFX A or aremini or 
SFX A or areminique or 
SFX A or areminine or 
SFX A or areminive or 
SFX A or arentur or 
SFX A or arenturque or 
SFX A or arenturne or 
SFX A or arenturve or 
SFX A or are or # impératif présent
SFX A or areque or 
SFX A or arene or 
SFX A or areve or 
SFX A or ari or # infinitif présent
SFX A or arique or 
SFX A or arine or 
SFX A or arive or 
SFX A or ans or # participe présent
SFX A or ansque or 
SFX A or ansne or 
SFX A or ansve or 
SFX A or antem or 
SFX A or antemque or 
SFX A or antemne or 
SFX A or antemve or 
SFX A or antis or 
SFX A or antisque or 
SFX A or antisne or 
SFX A or antisve or 
SFX A or anti or 
SFX A or antique or 
SFX A or antine or 
SFX A or antive or 
SFX A or ante or 
SFX A or anteque or 
SFX A or antene or 
SFX A or anteve or 
SFX A or antes or 
SFX A or antesque or 
SFX A or antesne or 
SFX A or antesve or 
SFX A or antium or 
SFX A or antiumque or 
SFX A or antiumne or 
SFX A or antiumve or 
SFX A or antibus or 
SFX A or antibusque or 
SFX A or antibusne or 
SFX A or antibusve or 
SFX A or antia or 
SFX A or antiaque or 
SFX A or antiane or 
SFX A or antiave or 
SFX A or andum or # gérondif
SFX A or andumque or 
SFX A or andumne or 
SFX A or andumve or 
SFX A or andi or 
SFX A or andique or 
SFX A or andine or 
SFX A or andive or 
SFX A or ando or 
SFX A or andoque or 
SFX A or andone or 
SFX A or andove or 
SFX A or andus or # adjectif verbal
SFX A or andusque or 
SFX A or andusne or 
SFX A or andusve or 
SFX A or ande or 
SFX A or andeque or 
SFX A or andene or 
SFX A or andeve or 
SFX A or andum or 
SFX A or andumque or 
SFX A or andumne or 
SFX A or andumve or 
SFX A or andi or 
SFX A or andique or 
SFX A or andine or 
SFX A or andive or 
SFX A or ando or 
SFX A or andoque or 
SFX A or andone or 
SFX A or andove or 
SFX A or anda or 
SFX A or andaque or 
SFX A or andane or 
SFX A or andave or 
SFX A or andam or 
SFX A or andamque or 
SFX A or andamne or 
SFX A or andamve or 
SFX A or andae or 
SFX A or andaeque or 
SFX A or andaene or 
SFX A or andaeve or 
SFX A or andos or 
SFX A or andosque or 
SFX A or andosne or 
SFX A or andosve or 
SFX A or andorum or 
SFX A or andorumque or 
SFX A or andorumne or 
SFX A or andorumve or 
SFX A or andis or 
SFX A or andisque or 
SFX A or andisne or 
SFX A or andisve or 
SFX A or andas or 
SFX A or andasque or 
SFX A or andasne or 
SFX A or andasve or 
SFX A or andarum or 
SFX A or andarumque or 
SFX A or andarumne or 
SFX A or andarumve or 
