src/app/lib/typo_js/tests/dictionaries/la/la.dic
aberro/APS
concordo/APS
concurso/APS
condenso/APS
confirmo/APS
conflo/APS
conformo/APS
conglobo/APS
congrego/APS
coniugo/APS
conor/A
considero/APS
consono/A
conspisso/APS
consummo/APS
contemplor/A
contestor/A
contrecto/APS
convivo/A
copulo/APS
corroboro/APS
creo/AP
cumulo/APS
curvo/APS
debilito/APS
declino/APS
decuplo/APS
deformo/APS
degusto/APS
deleo/APS
delinio/A
denomino/APS
denso/APS
depugno/APS
deseco/A
designo/APS
destino/APS
determino/APS
devio/APS
dico/ABPS
difflo/A
dimico/APS
discrepo/AP
disgrego/APS
displico/A
disseco/A
distermino/APS
disturbo/APS
divino/APS
dominor/A
dubito/APS
duplico/APS
duro/APS
eiaculo/APS
elevo/APS
eliquo/APS
emaculo/APS
emendo/APS
evacuo/APS
exaequo/APS
examino/APS
exaspero/APS
excito/APS
excogito/APS
exemplo/APS
existimo/APS
exorno/APS
explano/APS
exploro/APS
exsicco/APS
extenuo/APS
exto/A
exulto/APS
fabrico/APS
famulor/A
festino/APS
firmo/APS
flo/APS
formido/APS
foro/APS
fraudo/APS
frustro/APS
gemino/APS
gesto/APS
glorior/A
habito/APS
horoscopo/A
ignoro/APS
illustro/APS
imitor/A
immuto/APS
impetro/A
imputo/APS
inchoo/APS
inclino/APS
inculco/APS
indago/APS
indignor/A
inflo/APS
initio/APS
insinuo/APS
inspecto/APS
instauro/APS
insufflo/APS
intercalo/APS
interrogo/APS
interturbo/A
invetero/APS
irrigo/APS
irroro/APS
iudico/APS
iuvo/A
laboro/APS
lasso/APS
laxo/APS
lego/ABPS
libro/APS
lineo/APS
lustro/APS
medio/A
memoro/APS
mensuro/APS
metor/A
miror/A
moderor/A
monstro/APS
multiplico/APS
muto/APS
narro/APS
navo/APS
no/APS
notifico/A
novo/APS
nuncupo/APS
oblecto/APS
obscuro/APS
obtempero/APS
obumbro/APS
occupo/APS
odoror/A
onero/APS
opinor/A
opto/APS
orno/APS
oscito/APS
pario/ABPS
participo/APS
penetro/APS
perambulo/APS
perfabrico/APS
periclitor/A
permuto/APS
perscrutor/A
persono/A
pertracto/APS
philosophor/AP
porto/APS
praeconor/A
praefor/A
praemeditor/A
praenoto/APS
praesento/A
precor/A
probo/APS
procreo/AP
pronuncio/APS
propago/APS
propino/APS
prospecto/APS
provoco/A
pullulo/APS
puto/APS
quadruplico/AS
quadruplor/A
radio/APS
reciproco/APS
recompenso/APS
recreo/APS
reformo/APS
relaxo/APS
religo/APS
remoror/A
repenso/APS
repugno/APS
reseco/A
respiro/APS
retardo/APS
reverbero/APS
rimor/A
rogo/APS
roto/APS
sacco/APS
saluto/APS
sciscitor/A
seco/A
sedo/APS
separo/APS
significo/APS
simulo/APS
somnio/APS
specto/APS
spero/APS
stillo/APS
sto/A
subsanno/APS
succollo/APS
suffuror/A
supero/APS
supputo/APS
sustento/APS
tempero/APS
tento/APS
testor/A
torno/APS
transmeo/APS
triplo/AS
trutino/APS
tutor/A
vacillo/APS
vagor/A
vario/AP
velifico/APS
vendico/APS
verifico/A
vestigo/APS
vindico/APS
vitio/APS
voco/APS
volo/APSq
vulgo/APS
